Utah statutes.
11-13-303.   Source of project entity's payment of sales and use tax --
Gross receipts taxes for facilities providing additional project capacity.
(1)  A project entity is not exempt from sales and use taxes under Title 59,
Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act, to the extent provided in Subsection
59-12-104(2).
(2)  A project entity may make payments or prepayments of sales and use taxes,
as provided in Title 63M, Chapter 5, Resource Development, from the proceeds
of revenue bonds issued under Section 11-13-218 or other revenues of the
project entity.
(3) (a)  This Subsection (3) applies with respect to facilities providing
additional project capacity.
(b) (i)  The in lieu excise tax imposed under Title 59, Chapter 8, Gross
Receipts Tax on Certain Corporations Not Required to Pay Corporate Franchise
or Income Tax Act, shall be imposed collectively on all gross receipts derived
with respect to the ownership interests of all project entities and other
public agencies in facilities providing additional project capacity as though
all such ownership interests were held by a single project entity.
(ii)  The in lieu excise tax shall be calculated as though the gross receipts
derived with respect to all such ownership interests were received by a single
taxpayer that has no other gross receipts.
(iii)  The gross receipts attributable to such ownership interests shall
consist solely of gross receipts that are expended by each project entity and
other public agency holding an ownership interest in the facilities for the
operation or maintenance of or ordinary repairs or replacements to the
facilities.
(iv)  For purposes of calculating the in lieu excise tax, the determination of
whether there is a tax rate and, if so, what the tax rate is shall be governed
by Section 59-8-104, except that the $10,000,000 figures in Section 59-8-104
indicating the amount of gross receipts that determine the applicable tax rate
shall be replaced with $5,000,000.
(c)  Each project entity and public agency owning an interest in the
facilities providing additional project capacity shall be liable only for the
portion of the gross receipts tax referred to in Subsection (3)(b) that is
proportionate to its percentage ownership interest in the facilities and may
not be liable for any other gross receipts taxes with respect to its
percentage ownership interest in the facilities.
(d)  No project entity or other public agency that holds an ownership interest
in the facilities may be subject to the taxes imposed under Title 59, Chapter
7, Corporate Franchise and Income Taxes, with respect to those facilities.
(4)  For purposes of calculating the gross receipts tax imposed on a project
entity or other public agency under Title 59, Chapter 8, Gross Receipts Tax on
Certain Corporations Not Required to Pay Corporate Franchise or Income Tax
Act, or Subsection (3), gross receipts include only gross receipts from the
first sale of capacity, services, or other benefits and do not include gross
receipts from any subsequent sale, resale, or layoff of the capacity,
services, or other benefits.
